Hawaii statutes.
§576B-317 Communications between tribunals.
A tribunal of this State may communicate with a tribunal outside this State in
a record or by telephone, electronic mail, or other means, to obtain
information concerning the laws, the legal effect of a judgment, decree, or
order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding. A tribunal of this
State may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal outside
this State. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next